Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-222.5 Claims adjusters; limited
license. (a) The commissioner may issue a limited license to an adjuster
who only adjusts either workers' compensation or crop insurance claims;
provided that the adjuster:

(1) Is domiciled in the State of Hawaii, or in a
state that permits residents of the State of Hawaii to act as adjusters in that
other state;

(2) Has had experience, special education, or
training in handling loss claims under workers' compensation or crop insurance
contracts of sufficiently reasonable duration and extent to enable an
individual to fulfill the responsibilities of an adjuster;

(3) Has a passing grade on the workers' compensation
or crop insurance examination pursuant to section 431:9-206 or has a passing
grade on an examination approved by the Risk Management Agency of the United
States Department of Agriculture; and

(4) Pays the applicable fees.

(b) An adjuster with a limited license issued
under this section may extend the license biennially upon successfully passing
a reexamination. [L 1995, c 234, §4; am L 2004, c 122, §27; am L 2009, c
77, §8; am L 2010, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next